Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 3. General Regulatory Provisions

§ 37-8-301.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-301

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning permanent cards and decals, operation without certificate or permit, and inspections, see §

31-18-301

.

§ 37-8-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to identification.

§§ 37-8-303 and 37-8-304.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§

31-18-302

and

31-18-303

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Section

31-18-302

was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

§ 37-8-305.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-304

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning display of name or trade name, see §

31-18-304

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, repealed a former §

37-8-305

, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, § 12, and related to contract carriers legally operating on January 1, 1935.

§§ 37-8-306 through 37-8-320.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

See note catchlined “Revision of chapter” at beginning of chapter.

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 65, §§ 16, 20; Laws 1937, ch. 121, §§ 9 to 18, 26; Laws 1959, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2, related to permits.

§ 37-8-321.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-807

by Laws 1983, ch. 108, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to special permits for certain combinations of vehicles, see §

31-18-807

.

§ 37-8-322.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

See note catchlined “Revision of chapter” at beginning of chapter.

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 41, § 1, related to certificate of insurance or bond of fleet carriers.